Utah statutes.
61-2b-9.   Licensure or certification required -- Application.
Except as provided in Subsections 61-2b-3(2) and 61-2b-6(2), any individual
who prepares or causes to be prepared an appraisal, an appraisal report, or a
certified appraisal report in this state, in order to lawfully engage in such
activity in this state, shall:
(1)  make application in writing for licensure or certification as provided in
this chapter in the form as the division may prescribe; and
(2)  become licensed or certified under this chapter.
